Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-765
Blanket sickness and accident insurance; legal liability of policyholders not affected.

Nothing contained in sections 44-762 to 44-765 shall be deemed to affect the legal liability of policyholders for the death of or injury to, any such member of such group.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 17(4), p. 471.